Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1513.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-4550, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-4550. Temporary registration plate; design A. A person who issues temporary registration plates shall affix or insert, Each temporary registration plate that is issued or authorized for use on a vehicle in this state shall be uniform in design and format. A temporary registration plate shall clearly and indelibly, display on the face of each temporary registration plate the date of issuance and expiration and the make and vehicle identification number of the vehicle.  The temporary registration plates shall not bear the name or address of the person who purchased the vehicle in a position that is legible from outside the vehicle. B. Each temporary registration plate must: 1. Be easily legible during daylight hours and from a distance of one HUNDRED feet. 2. Use contrasting colors, a font size and letters and numbers that are sufficient to ensure legibility similar to the license plates provided pursuant to section 28-2351. 3. Be constructed of materials and be printed in a manner to maintain legibility for the entire period of use, accounting for exposure to weather and normal driving conditions. 4. Be securely affixed to the vehicle in a manner that is clearly visible from outside the vehicle. END_STATUTE